Massachusetts, session 194th, H2046.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 32G of Chapter 94C of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official 
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting the following new subsection:  
(1) It shall be unlawful for any person to possess, purchase, deliver, sell, or possess 
with intent to sell or deliver a tableting machine, an encapsulating machine, drug molds, or 
controlled substance counterfeiting materials knowing, intending, or having reasonable cause to 
believe that it will be used to manufacture a controlled substance or counterfeit controlled 
substance. Any person who violates this subsection, or violates any regulation adopted by the 
Board of Registration in Pharmacy relative to the use or licensing of such equipment, shall be 
guilty of a felony punishable by a sentence of not less than 1 year and not more than 5 years in 
the state prison or county house of correction or by a fine of up to $25,000, or both such fine and 
imprisonment. 

of 2 12  (2) The Board of Registration in Pharmacy shall adopt rules and regulations for 
standards of compliance for the use of and licensing of pill press machines for the legal use of 
the any of the said devices in this section. 
(3) The Board of Registration in Pharmacy may require registration of pill presses or 
similar equipment to be promulgated by the Board.